Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-208.07
Barber instructor; inactive status; renewal of registration; failure to renew for five years; effect.

Any barber instructor on inactive status or who withdraws from the active practice of barber instructing may renew his or her registration within five years of its expiration date upon the payment of the required restoration fee. Any barber instructor who fails to renew his or her registration for five consecutive years shall be required to successfully complete the examination for issuance of a new registration.

Laws 1975, LB 66, § 4;

Laws 1978, LB 722, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 226, § 5.